North Carolina statutes. Chapter 135. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; Social Security; State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
Article 4. Consolidated Judicial Retirement Act.
§ 135-56.
Creditable service.

Subject to such rules and regulations as the Board of Trustees shall adopt with regard to the verification of a judge’s prior service, the prior service of a judge shall consist of his service rendered prior to January 1, 1974, as a justice of the Supreme
Court, judge of the Court of Appeals, judge of the superior court, judge of the district court division of the General Court of Justice, as administrative officer of the courts, or as a solicitor or district attorney.

On or before December 31, 2021, when membership ceases as a result of a member’s withdrawal of his or her accumulated contributions, the prior service and previous membership service of the member shall no longer be considered to be creditable service;
provided, however, that if a member whose creditable service has been cancelled in accordance with this subsection subsequently returns to membership for a period of five years, the member may thereafter repay in a lump sum the
amount withdrawn plus regular interest thereon from the date of withdrawal through the date of repayment and thereby increase his or her creditable service by the amount of creditable service lost when the member withdrew his or
her accumulated contributions.

(b1)
On and after January 1, 2022, when membership ceases as a result of a member’s withdrawal of his or her accumulated contributions, the prior service and previous membership service of the member shall no longer
be creditable service. If a member whose creditable service has been cancelled in accordance with this subsection subsequently returns to membership service and completes five years of membership service upon that return, then
the member may purchase an amount of creditable service corresponding to the total of the membership service associated with the withdrawn contributions, provided that the total amount of creditable service purchased under
this subsection may not exceed five years. The member shall purchase this service by paying a lump sum amount to the Annuity Savings Fund equal to the full liability increase due to the additional service credits on the basis
of the assumptions used for the purposes of the actuarial valuation of the liabilities of the Retirement System, except for the following assumptions specific to this calculation: (i) the allowance shall be assumed to commence
at the earliest age at which the member could retire on an unreduced retirement allowance and (ii) assumed annual postretirement allowance increases as set by the Board of Trustees upon the advice of the consulting actuary.
The increases as set by the Board of Trustees upon the advice of the consulting actuary shall also include an administrative fee to be set by the Board.Subject to the requirements of this subsection, an employer may pay all
or part of the cost of a service purchase of a member in service. To the extent that the purchase is paid by the employer, the cost paid by the employer shall be credited to the pension accumulation fund. To the extent that
the purchase is paid by the member, the cost paid by the member shall be credited to the member’s annuity savings account.

On and after January 1, 1984, the creditable service of a member who was a member of the former Uniform Solicitorial or Uniform Clerks of Superior Court Retirement Systems at the time of merger of those Systems into this Consolidated Judicial Retirement
System and whose accumulated contributions are transferred from those Systems to this System, includes service that was creditable in the Uniform Solicitorial and Uniform Clerks of Superior Court Retirement Systems; and membership
service with those Retirement Systems is membership service with this Retirement System.

Prior to January 1, 2023, any member may purchase creditable service for service as a judge, district attorney, or clerk of superior court, when not otherwise provided for in this section, and as a judge of any lawfully constituted court of this State
inferior to the superior court, not to include service as a magistrate, justice of the peace or mayor’s court judge. The member, after the transfer of any accumulated contributions from the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement
System or Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, shall pay an amount equal to the full cost of the service credits calculated on the basis of the assumptions used for purposes of the actuarial valuation of the System’s
liabilities, taking into account the additional retirement allowance arising on account of the additional service credit commencing at the earliest age at which the member could retire with an unreduced retirement allowance as
determined by the Board of Trustees upon the advice of the consulting actuary. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this subsection that provide for the purchase of service credits, the terms “full cost”, “full liability”,
and “full actuarial cost” include assumed annual post-retirement allowance increases, as determined by the Board of Trustees, from the earliest age at which a member could retire on an unreduced service allowance.

(d1)
Notwithstanding any provision of this Chapter to the contrary, on and after January 1, 2023, any member may purchase creditable service for service as a judge, district attorney, or clerk of superior court, when
not otherwise provided for in this section, and as a judge of any lawfully constituted court of this State inferior to the superior court, not to include service as a magistrate, justice of the peace, or mayor’s court judge.
The member, after the transfer of any accumulated contributions from the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System or Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, shall pay an amount equal to the full cost of the
additional service credits calculated on the basis of the assumptions used for purposes of the actuarial valuation of the System’s liabilities, taking into account the additional retirement allowance arising on account of the
additional service credit commencing at the earliest age at which the member could retire with an unreduced retirement allowance as determined by the Board of Trustees upon the advice of the consulting actuary, plus an administrative
fee to be set by the Board of Trustees. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this subsection that provide for the purchase of service credits, the terms “full cost”, “full liability”, and “full actuarial cost” include
assumed annual postretirement allowance increases, as determined by the Board of Trustees, from the earliest age at which a member could retire on an unreduced service allowance.

Prior to January 1, 2023, any member may purchase creditable service for service as a member of the General Assembly not otherwise creditable under this section, provided the service is not credited in the Legislative Retirement Fund nor the Legislative
Retirement System, and further provided the member pays a lump sum amount equal to the full cost of the additional service credits calculated on the basis of the assumptions used for the purposes of the actuarial valuation of the
System’s liabilities, taking into account the additional retirement allowance arising on account of the additional service credits commencing at the earliest age at which a member could retire on an unreduced retirement allowance
as determined by the Board of Trustees upon the advice of the consulting actuary, plus an administrative fee to be set by the Board of Trustees. Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this subsection that provide for the purchase
of service credits, the terms “full cost”, “full liability”, and “full actuarial cost” include assumed annual post-retirement allowance increases, as determined by the Board of Trustees, from the earliest age at which a member
could retire on an unreduced service allowance.

(e1)
Notwithstanding any provision of this Chapter to the contrary, on and after January 1, 2023, any member in service with five or more years of membership service may purchase creditable service for service as a
member of the General Assembly not otherwise creditable under this section, provided the service is not credited in the Legislative Retirement Fund nor the Legislative Retirement System, by paying a total lump sum payment.
The amount of creditable service purchased under this subsection may not exceed a total of five years. The member shall purchase this service by paying a lump sum amount to the Annuity Savings Fund equal to the full liability
increase due to the additional service credits on the basis of the assumptions used for the purposes of the actuarial valuation of the liabilities of the Retirement System, except for the following assumptions specific to this
calculation: (i) the allowance shall be assumed to commence at the earliest age at which the member could retire on an unreduced retirement allowance and (ii) assumed annual postretirement allowance increases as set by the
Board of Trustees upon the advice of the consulting actuary. Subject to the requirements of this subsection, an employer may pay all or part of the cost of a service purchase of a member in service. To the extent that the purchase
is paid by the employer, the cost paid by the employer shall be credited to the pension accumulation fund. To the extent that the purchase is paid by the member, the cost paid by the member shall be credited to the member’s
annuity savings account.

The creditable service of a member who was a member of the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, or the Legislative Retirement System and whose accumulated contributions and reserves are
transferred from that System to this System, includes service that was creditable in the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, or the Legislative Retirement System,
and membership service with those Retirement Systems is membership service with this Retirement System.

If a member who has not vested in this System on July 1, 2007, is convicted of an offense listed in

G.S. 135-75.1

for acts committed after July 1, 2007, then that member shall forfeit all benefits under this System. If a member who has vested in this System on July 1, 2007, is convicted of an offense listed in

G.S. 135-75.1

for acts committed after July 1, 2007, then that member is not entitled to any creditable service that accrued after July 1, 2007, regardless of whether that creditable service was earned by virtue of membership
in the System, accrued by conversion of sick leave at the point of the member’s retirement, accrued by transfer of service from another retirement system, purchased by the member in accordance with this Chapter, or accrued by any
other means. No member shall forfeit any benefit or creditable service earned from a position not as a justice, judge, district attorney, or clerk of superior court. For purposes of this subsection, creditable service attributable
to the conversion of sick leave accrues in this System on the date of retirement, service transferred to this System from another system accrues in this System on the effective date of the transfer, and purchased service accrues
in this System on the date of the purchase.

On and after July 1, 2007, the creditable service of a member who was a public defender and a member of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System at the time of transfer of membership from the previous system to this System shall include service
as a public defender that was creditable in the previous system immediately prior to July 1, 2007. The accumulated contributions, creditable service, and reserves, if any, of a member as a public defender shall be transferred from
the previous system to this System in the same manner as prescribed under

G.S. 135-28.1

as it pertained to judges of the district court division of the General Court of Justice.

On and after July 1, 2008, the creditable service of a member who is the Director of Indigent Defense Services and a member of the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System at the time of transfer of membership from the previous system to this
System shall include service as the Director of Indigent Defense Services beginning July 1, 2004, that was creditable in the previous system immediately prior to July 1, 2008. The accumulated contributions, creditable service,
and reserves, if any, of a member as the Director of Indigent Defense Services beginning July 1, 2004, shall be transferred from the previous system to this System in the same manner as prescribed under

G.S. 135-28.1

as it pertained to judges of the district court division of the General Court of Justice.

If a member who is in service and has not vested in this System on December 1, 2012, is convicted of an offense listed in

G.S. 135-75.1

A for acts committed after December 1, 2012, then that member shall forfeit all benefits under this System, except for a return of member contributions plus interest. If a member who is in service and has vested
in this System on December 1, 2012, is convicted of an offense listed in

G.S. 135-75.1

A for acts committed after December 1, 2012, then that member is not entitled to any creditable service that accrued after December 1, 2012, regardless of whether that creditable service was earned by virtue of membership
in the System, accrued by conversion of sick leave at the point of the member’s retirement, accrued by transfer of service from another retirement system, purchased by the member in accordance with this Chapter, or accrued by any
other means. For purposes of this subsection, creditable service attributable to the conversion of sick leave accrues in this System on the date of retirement, service transferred to this System from another system accrues in this
System on the effective date of the transfer, and purchased service accrues in this System on the date of the purchase.

History.
1973, c. 640, s. 1; 1977, c. 936; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1031, ss. 14, 15; 1985, c. 649, s. 1; 1989, c. 255, s. 21(a); 1999-237, s. 28.24(c); 2003-284, s. 30.18(f); 2007-179, s. 4(b); 2007-323, s. 28.21B(h); 2008-107,
s. 26.24(h); 2012-193, s. 6; 2020-29, s. 1(d), (e); 2020-48, s. 4.4(e), (f); 2021-57, ss. 3.1, 3.2(a), (b).

§ 135-56.01.
Reciprocity of creditable service with other State-administered retirement systems.

Only for the purpose of determining eligibility for benefits accruing under this Article, creditable service standing to the credit of a member of the Legislative Retirement System, Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, or the Local Governmental
Employees’ Retirement System shall be added to the creditable service standing to the credit of a member of this System; provided, that in the event a person is a retired member of any of the foregoing retirement systems, such
creditable service standing to the credit of the retired member prior to retirement shall be likewise counted. In no instance shall service credits maintained in the aforementioned retirement systems be added to the creditable
service in this System for application of this System’s benefit accrual rate in computing a service retirement benefit unless specifically authorized by this Article.

A person who was a former member of this System and who has forfeited his creditable service in this System by receiving a return of contributions and who has creditable service in the Legislative Retirement System, Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement
System, or the Local Government Employees’ Retirement System may count such creditable service for the purpose of restoring the creditable service forfeited in this System under the terms and conditions as set forth in this Article
and reestablish membership in this System.

Creditable service under this section shall not be counted twice for the same period of time whether earned as a member, purchased, or granted as prior service credits.

History.
1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1066, s. 35(d); 1997-456, s. 27.

§ 135-56.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983 (Regular Session, 1984), c. 1031, s. 16.

§ 135-56.2.
(Effective until January 1, 2022) Creditable service for other employment.

Any member may purchase creditable service for service as a State teacher or employee, as defined under

G.S. 135-1(10)

and (25), and for service as an employee of local government, as defined under

G.S. 128-21(10)

. A member, upon the completion of 10 years of membership service, may also purchase creditable service for periods of federal employment, provided that the member is not receiving any retirement benefits resulting from
this federal employment, and provided that the member is not vested in the particular federal retirement system to which the member may have belonged while a federal employee. The member, after the transfer of any accumulated contributions
from the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System or Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, shall pay an amount equal to the full cost of the service credits calculated on the basis of the assumptions used for purposes
of the actuarial valuation of the Retirement System’s liabilities, taking into account the additional retirement allowance arising on account of the additional service credits commencing at the earliest age at which the member could
retire with an unreduced retirement allowance as determined by the Board of Trustees upon the advice of the consulting actuary, plus an administrative fee as set by the Board of Trustees. As an alternative to transferring any accumulated
contributions from the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System or the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System to the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System, a member may irrevocably elect to transfer these contributions
to the Supplemental Retirement Income Plan of North Carolina as determined by the Plan’s Board of Trustees and the Department of State Treasurer in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 135-94(a)(4). Notwithstanding the foregoing
provisions of this section that provide for the purchase of service credits, the terms “full cost”, “full liability”, and “full actuarial cost” include assumed annual post-retirement allowance increases, as determined by the Board
of Trustees, from the earliest age at which a member could retire on an unreduced service allowance.

History.
1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1041; 1985, c. 348, s. 1; c. 749, s. 2; 1989, c. 255, s. 21(b).

§ 135-56.2.
Creditable service for other employment.

Any member may purchase creditable service for service as a State teacher or employee, as defined under

G.S. 135-1(10)

and (25), and for service as an employee of local government, as defined under

G.S. 128-21(10)

. A member, upon the completion of 10 years of membership service, may also purchase creditable service for periods of federal employment, provided that the member is not receiving any retirement benefits resulting from
this federal employment, and provided that the member is not vested in the particular federal retirement system to which the member may have belonged while a federal employee. The member, after the transfer of any accumulated contributions
from the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System or Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, shall purchase this service by paying a lump sum amount to the annuity savings fund equal to the full liability increase
due to the additional service credits on the basis of the assumptions used for the purposes of the actuarial valuation of the liabilities of the Retirement System, except for the following assumptions specific to this calculation:
(i) the allowance shall be assumed to commence at the earliest age at which the member could retire on an unreduced retirement allowance and (ii) assumed annual postretirement allowance increases as set by the Board of Trustees upon
the advice of the consulting actuary. Subject to the requirements of this subsection, an employer may pay all or part of the cost of a service purchase of a member in service. To the extent that the purchase is paid by the employer,
the cost paid by the employer shall be credited to the pension accumulation fund. As an alternative to transferring any accumulated contributions from the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System or the Local Governmental Employees’
Retirement System to the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System, a member may irrevocably elect to transfer these contributions to the Supplemental Retirement Income Plan of North Carolina as determined by the Plan’s Board of Trustees
and the Department of State Treasurer in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 135-94(a)(4). Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section that provide for the purchase of service credits, the terms “full cost”, “full liability”,
and “full actuarial cost” include assumed annual post-retirement allowance increases, as determined by the Board of Trustees, from the earliest age at which a member could retire on an unreduced service allowance.

History.
1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1041; 1985, c. 348, s. 1; c. 749, s. 2; 1989, c. 255, s. 21(b); 2021-57, s. 3.3.

§ 135-56.3.
Repayments and Purchases.

Purchase of Service Credits Through Rollover Contributions From Certain Other Plans. — Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, and without regard to any limitations on contributions otherwise set forth in this Article, a member, who is eligible
to restore or purchase membership or creditable service pursuant to the provisions of this Article, may, subject to such rules and regulations established by the Board of Trustees, purchase such service credits through rollover
contributions to the Annuity Savings Fund from (i) an annuity contract described in Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, (ii) an eligible plan under Section 457(b) of the Internal Revenue Code which is maintained by a state,
political subdivision of a state, or any agency or instrumentality of a state or political subdivision of a state, (iii) an individual retirement account or annuity described in Section 408(a) or 408(b) of the Internal Revenue
Code that is eligible to be rolled over and would otherwise be includible in gross income, or (iv) a qualified plan described in Section 401(a) or 403(a) of the Internal Revenue Code. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Retirement
System shall not accept any amount as a rollover contribution unless such amount is eligible to be rolled over to a qualified trust in accordance with applicable law and the member provides evidence satisfactory to the Retirement
System that such amount qualifies for rollover treatment. Unless received by the Retirement System in the form of a direct rollover, the rollover contribution must be paid to the Retirement System on or before the 60th day after
the date it was received by the member.

Purchase of Service Credits Through Plan-to-Plan Transfers. —
Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, and without regard to any limitations on contributions otherwise set forth in this Article, a member, who is eligible to restore or purchase membership or creditable
service pursuant to the provisions of this Article, may, subject to such rules and regulations established by the Board of Trustees, purchase such service credits through a direct transfer to the Annuity Savings Fund of funds
from (i) an annuity contract described in Section 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code or (ii) an eligible plan under Section 457(b) of the Code which is maintained by a state, political subdivision of a state, or any agency
or instrumentality of a state or political subdivision of a state.

Purchase of Service Credits Through Plan-to-Plan Transfers. — Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, and without regard to any limitations on contributions otherwise set forth in this Article, a member, who is eligible to restore or purchase
membership or creditable service pursuant to the provisions of this Article, may, subject to such rules and regulations established by the Board of Trustees, purchase such service credits through a direct transfer to the Annuity
Savings Fund of funds from (i) the Supplemental Retirement Income Plans A, B, or C of North Carolina or (ii) any other defined contribution plan qualified under Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code which is maintained by
the State of North Carolina, a political subdivision of a state, or any agency or instrumentality of a state or political subdivision of a state.

History.
2002-71, s. 7.

§ 135-57.
Service retirement.

Any member on or after January 1, 1974, who has attained his fiftieth birthday and five years of membership service may retire upon electronic submission or written application to the board of trustees setting forth at what time, as of the first day of
a calendar month, not less than one day nor more than 120 days subsequent to the execution and filing thereof, he desires to be retired.

(a1)
Repealed by Session Laws 2014-88, s. 3(h), effective July 30, 2014.

Any member who is a justice or judge of the General Court of Justice shall be automatically retired as of the first day of the calendar month coinciding with or next following the later of January 1, 1974, or his attainment of his seventy-second birthday;
provided, however, that no judge who is a member on January 1, 1974, shall be forced to retire under the provisions of this subsection at an earlier date than the last day that he is permitted to remain in office under the provisions
of

G.S. 7A-4.20

.

Any member who terminates service on or after January 1, 1974, having accumulated five or more years of creditable service may retire under the provisions of subsection (a) above, provided that he shall not have withdrawn his accumulated contributions
prior to the effective date of his retirement, and the requirement of subsection (a) that the member be in service shall not apply.

(c1)
Repealed by Session Laws 2014-88, s. 3(h), effective July 30, 2014.

Any member who was in service October 8, 1981, who had attained 50 years of age, may retire upon electronic submission or written application to the board of trustees setting forth at what time, as of the first day of a calendar month, not less than one
day nor more than 120 days subsequent to the execution and filing thereof, he desires to be retired.

History.
1973, c. 640, s. 1; 1981, c. 378, s. 6; 1983, c. 761, s. 230; 1987, c. 513, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 873, s. 2; 2007-431, s. 4; 2009-66, ss. 3(e), 12(i), (j); 2011-232, s. 8; 2014-88, s. 3(h).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-431, s. 4, effective July 1, 2007, substituted “120 days” for “90 days” in subsection (a).

Session Laws 2009-66, ss. 3(e), 12(i) and (j), effective July 1, 2009, in subsection (a), inserted “electronic submission or”; and, in subsection (d), inserted “electronic submission or” and substituted “120 days” for “90 days.”

Session Laws 2011-232, s. 8, effective August 1, 2011, inserted “who became a member prior to August 1, 2011, and” in subsection (a); added subsection (a1); inserted “and having become a member prior to August 1, 2011” in subsection (c); and added subsection
(c1).

Session Laws 2014-88, s. 3(h), effective July 30, 2014, deleted “who became a member prior to August 1, 2011, and” preceding “who has attained” in subsection (a); and deleted former (a1) and (c1); and deleted “and having become a member prior to August
1, 2011” preceding “may retire” in subsection (c).